District of Columbia statutes.
5-563.01

Termination of existing special salary rates and adjustments.

Beginning on December 21, 2000:

(1)

No existing special salary rates shall be authorized for members of the United States Park Police under section 5305 of title 5, United States Code (or any previous similar provision of law); and

(2)

No special rates of pay or special pay adjustments shall be applicable to members of the United States Park Police pursuant to section 405 of the Federal Law Enforcement Pay Reform Act of 1990.

History

Dec. 21, 2000, 114 Stat. 2763, Pub. L. 106-554, § 1(a)(4), H.R. 5666 § 905